Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2111
Notice of revocation; service; hearing.

The commissioner shall serve notice of revocation on the contractor by mailing such notice by certified mail or any other manner of delivery by which the United States Postal Service can verify delivery to the address of the contractor or the contractor's registered agent listed in the application. Upon a showing of compliance with the application requirements set out in section 48-2105, the commissioner may temporarily reinstate the registration pending a hearing on the revocation. A registration revoked under this section shall not be permanently reinstated. To receive a new registration number, the contractor shall reapply to the commissioner.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 180, § 7.